New Jersey, session 222, S3446.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.40A:10-29 is amended to read as follows: 40A:10-29.  In addition to the insurance required under chapter 15 of Title 34 of the Revised Statutes, a municipality maintaining a volunteer fire department, or in which there are one or more incorporated volunteer fire companies whose members have or shall form themselves into a group or groups for the purpose of obtaining a group life insurance plan with any insurance company authorized to  do business in New Jersey, may appropriate moneys to defray the cost of such insurance and pay the premiums therefor. A municipality shall not undertake the cost nor pay the premiums on any policy of group life insurance where the amount payable upon the death of each assured exceeds the amount of [$25,000] $250,000. A municipality shall pay reasonable funeral and burial costs upon the death of an assured volunteer firefighter, to the extent those costs are not covered by the New Jersey State Firemens Association or a firemens relief association established in accordance with R.S.43:17-1 et seq. (cf: P.L.2007, c.220, s.2) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1957, c.168 (C.43:12-28.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    A survivor's pension granted under section 1 of P.L.1957, c.168 (C.43:12-28.1) shall be for the sum of (a) [$15,000] $30,000 annually and shall be paid  to the widow, during her widowhood, or to the child or children of such firefighter, emergency medical technician, or first aid or rescue squad worker, if he leaves no surviving widow, or to such child or children after the death of such widow, (b) [$10,000] $20,000 annually and shall be paid  to the child or children of such firefighter, emergency medical technician, or first aid or rescue squad worker, if the surviving widow remarries, or (c) [$5,000] $10,000 annually and shall be paid to the parent or parents of such firefighter, emergency medical technician, or first aid or rescue squad worker, if he leaves no surviving widow or child.  As used in this section, the terms "widow" and "widowhood" shall also include "widower" and "widowerhood" respectively. (cf: P.L.2002, c.134, s.2) 3.    Section 12 of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-203) is amended to read as follows: 12. a. Each enforcing agency in this State shall enforce the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.) in all buildings, structures, and premises within its jurisdiction, except owner-occupied buildings used exclusively for dwelling purposes and containing fewer than three dwelling units, subject to the control and supervision of the commissioner and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.  The commissioner shall consult with and advise all local enforcement agencies enforcing the provision of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.), and each local enforcement agency shall provide the commissioner with reports, data, and information required by the commissioner.  To cover the cost to the municipality of conducting inspections under P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.), the municipality may, by ordinance, establish fees, which shall be paid into the treasury of the municipality to which the local enforcing agency is responsible, and which shall be appropriated by the municipality to the local enforcing agency to pay the cost of enforcing P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.). b.    A local enforcing agency consisting of or employing at least one paid fire inspector who is licensed pursuant to subsection c. of this section may elect to inspect high-rise structures and life hazard uses within its jurisdiction, in lieu of inspection by the commissioner.  That election shall be made by resolution of the governing body having jurisdiction over the local enforcing agency.  If an appropriate resolution has not been received by the commissioner on or before the effective date of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.), the department shall perform all inspections under this subsection until such time as the governing body shall adopt and send to the commissioner an appropriate resolution.  A local enforcing agency that elects to inspect high-rise structures and life hazard uses may issue the certificates of inspection required to be issued pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-205) and may inspect buildings and premises other than high-rise structures and life hazard uses in order to secure compliance with P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.). c.     The commissioner shall license fire inspectors and fire officials under P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.) in accordance with standards as the commissioner shall establish by regulation.  As a condition of licensure, a person shall: (1)   submit an application to the Division of Fire Safety with the required fee; (2)   successfully complete an educational program adopted by the Division of Fire Safety's Office of Training, Certification, and Licensing; (3)   meet prerequisite criteria established by regulation; and (4)   pass the State written and practical exams. d.    A licensed fire inspector and fire official shall conduct fire inspections authorized by P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.) and established by regulation in non-life-hazard and life-hazard use groups. e.     Fire inspector and fire official certifications approved by the Office of Training and Certification prior to the effective date of P.L.2025, c.19 shall be considered equivalent to licenses established pursuant to P.L.2025, c.19. f.     Existing licensed multiple dwelling inspectors and officials enforcing the fire code in non-life hazard use dwellings shall be allowed two years from the effective date of P.L.2025, c.19 to obtain a fire inspector license to be able to continue enforcing the fire code. g.    In order to cover the cost to the municipality of providing insurance or other benefits provided to volunteer firefighters under N.J.S.40A:10-29 and N.J.S.40A:10-30, the municipality may, by ordinance, establish a surcharge for each inspection for which a fee is charged pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  Funds raised from the surcharge shall be paid into the treasury of the municipality to which the local enforcing agency is responsible. (cf: P.L.2025, c.19, s.5) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.